Washington statutes.
RCW 2.30.040

Funding—Federal funding—Use of state moneys.

Jurisdictions may seek federal funding available to support the operation of its therapeutic court and associated services and must match, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, state moneys allocated for therapeutic courts with local cash or in-kind resources. Moneys allocated by the state may be used to supplement, not supplant other federal, state, and local funds for therapeutic courts. However, until June 30, 2016, no match is required for state moneys expended for the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a therapeutic court authorized under this chapter.

[ 2015 c 291 s 4.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—2015 c 291: See note following RCW 2.30.010.